Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.030

Money transmitter license required.

(1) A person may not engage in the business of money transmission, or advertise, solicit, or hold itself out as providing money transmission, unless the person is:

(a) Licensed as a money transmitter under this chapter;

(b) An authorized delegate of a person licensed as a money transmitter under this chapter; or

(c) Excluded under RCW 19.230.020.

(2) A money transmitter license is not transferable or assignable.

[ 2017 c 30 s 3; 2003 c 287 s 5.]